Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4307.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5139. (1) A physician or an optometrist has no affirmative obligation to but may voluntarily report to the secretary of state or warn third parties regarding a patient's mental and physical qualifications to operate a motor vehicle in a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons and property due to an episode. A physician or an optometrist who chooses not to make a report to the secretary of state or warn third parties as provided for under this subsection is immune from any criminal or civil liability to the patient or third party that may have been injured by the patient's actions. (2) A physician or an optometrist may make a report under this section and submit that report to the secretary of state for the purpose of initiating or contributing to an examination of an applicant's physical and mental qualifications to operate a motor vehicle in a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons and property pursuant to section under sections 309 and 309a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.309 and 257.309a. In making that report, the physician or optometrist shall recommend a period of suspension as determined appropriate by the physician or optometrist as follows: (a) In Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, in the case of a patient holding an operator's license, that the suspension be for at least 6 months or longer. If a patient has experienced an epileptic seizure, a physician may submit a report recommending a period of suspension as described in section 309a(2) or (3) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.309a. (b) In the case of a patient holding a commercial license, that the suspension be for at least 12 months or longer. (3) A physician or an optometrist making a report under subsection (2), acting in good faith and exercising due care as evidenced by documenting his or her the physician's or optometrist's file or medical record regarding an episode, is immune from any civil or criminal liability resulting from the report to the patient or a third party that may have been injured by the patient's actions. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Episode" means any of the following: (i) An experience derived from a condition that causes or contributes to loss of consciousness, blackout, seizure, a fainting spell, syncope, or any other impairment of the level of consciousness. (ii) An experience derived from a condition that causes an impairment of an individual's driving judgment. (iii) An experience derived from an impairment of an individual's vision. (b) "Optometrist" means that term as defined under part 174.in section 17401. (c) "Physician" means that term as defined under part 170 or 175.in section 17001 or 17501. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4306 (request no. H01772'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.